Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [169.8294] WEIGHT LIMITS; VEHICLES TRANSPORTING BULK DRY GOODS. new text end new text begin (a) Except for weight limitations on the total gross vehicle weight of all axles of a vehicle, the weight limitations on an axle or axle group under sections 169.823 to 169.829 are increased by ten percent for a vehicle transporting dry bulk goods. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "dry bulk goods" means any homogeneous unmarked, unpackaged, nonliquid cargo being transported in a trailer specifically designed for that purpose. new text end